District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.14

Applicability.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the provisions of this subchapter shall apply to group health benefit plans issued or renewed after July 1, 1997.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 314, 45 DCR 8433
See notes to § 31-3301.01.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
1981 Ed., § 35-1044.